Oklahoma, session 2026, SB486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-101.9 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A school district board of education may contract with a


chaplain to perform the duties of a school counselor. A chaplain


shall not be required to meet the certification requirements of


Section 6-122.3 or 6-187 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes and


shall not be considered a teacher as defined by Section 1-116 of


Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes. For the purposes of this


section, “chaplain” means an ordained or authorized pastor,


minister, priest, or other ecclesiastical dignitary of any

Req. No. 1576 Page 1


denomination who has been duly ordained or authorized by the church


to which the person belongs.


B. A chaplain hired pursuant to the provisions of this section


shall be subject to a national criminal history record check as


required by Section 5-142 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1576 EB 1/19/2025 5:37:20 AM

























Req. No. 1576 Page 2